Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 9 Charitable Trusts

18-9-1.
Division of charitable trusts — Establishment.

There is established, in the department of, and subject to the control of, the attorney general, a division for the supervision and enforcement of the due application of funds given or appropriated to charitable trusts within the state and for the prevention of breaches of trust. The division shall be known as the division of charitable trusts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-1

.

18-9-2.
Administrator of charitable trusts.

The executive and administrative head of the division of charitable trusts shall be the administrator of charitable trusts. The administrator shall be appointed by the attorney general and shall hold office at the attorney general’s pleasure. The administrator shall be qualified by training and experience to perform the duties of the administrator’s office and shall receive any salary, not exceeding six thousand dollars ($6,000) annually, that the governor may determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-2

.

18-9-3.
Appointment and removal of assistants — Experts.

The administrator, with the approval and consent of the attorney general, may appoint and remove any assistants that the work of the division may require. These assistants shall not be in the classified service. The administrator, with the approval and consent of the attorney general, may also, from time to time, engage experts who shall not be in the classified service for assistance in any specific matter at a reasonable rate of compensation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-3

.

18-9-4.
“Charitable trusts” defined.

“Charitable trusts” as used in this chapter means any fiduciary relationship with respect to property arising as a result of a manifestation of an intention to create it and subjecting the person by whom the property is held to equitable duties to deal with the property for charitable, educational, or religious purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-4

.

18-9-5.
Notice to attorney general of proceedings affecting charitable trusts.

The attorney general shall be notified of all judicial proceedings affecting, or in any manner dealing with, a charitable trust, or affecting, or in any manner dealing with, a trustee who holds in trust within the state property given, devised, or bequeathed for charitable, educational, or religious purposes, and who administers or is under a duty to administer the property in whole or in part for these purposes within the state, and shall be deemed to be an interested party to the judicial proceedings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-5

.

18-9-6.
Register of charitable trusts — Special assistant attorney general.

In addition to his or her common law and statutory powers the attorney general, or the administrator acting under the authority and at the direction of the attorney general, shall have the authority to prepare and maintain a register of all charitable trusts previously or subsequently established or active in the state. The attorney general shall also designate the administrator or acting administrator to act as a special assistant attorney general in cases involving charitable trusts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 5; P.L. 1951, ch. 2852, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-6

.

18-9-7.
Register open to inspection — Registration fee.

The register established by §

18-9-6

shall be open to the inspection of any person at any reasonable times and for any legitimate purposes that the attorney general may determine.

The attorney general may by regulation provide that any investigation of charitable trusts made after June 30, 1950, shall not be open to public inspection.

Upon the registration of each charitable trust there shall be paid to the attorney general a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) which shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-7

; P.L. 1987, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 48.

18-9-8.
Rules and regulations.

The attorney general, or the administrator acting under the authority and at the direction of the attorney general, shall make any rules and regulations that may be reasonable or necessary to secure records and other information for the operation of the register and for the supervision, investigation, and enforcement of charitable trusts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-8

.

18-9-9.
Investigations as to administration of trusts.

The attorney general may investigate at any time charitable trusts for the purpose of determining and ascertaining whether they are being administered in accordance with law and with the terms and purposes of the trust. For the purposes of this investigation the attorney general may require any person, agent, trustee, fiduciary, beneficiary, institution, association, or corporation administering a trust or having an interest in, or knowledge of the trust, to appear at any time and place that the attorney general may designate, then and there under oath to produce for the use of the attorney general any and all books, memoranda, papers of whatever kind, documents of title, or other evidence of assets or liabilities which may be in the ownership or possession or control of the person, agent, trustee, fiduciary, beneficiary, institution, association, or corporation, and to furnish any other available information relating to the trust that the attorney general may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-9

.

18-9-10.
Notice to attend in investigations.

Whenever the attorney general may require the attendance of any person, agent, trustee, fiduciary, beneficiary, institution, association, or corporation as provided in §

18-9-9

, the attorney general shall issue a notice setting the time and place when the attendance is required and shall cause the notice to be delivered or sent by registered or certified mail to the person, agent, trustee, fiduciary, beneficiary, institution, association, or corporation at least fourteen (14) days before the date fixed in the notice for the attendance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-10

.

18-9-11.
Court order to appear before attorney general — Contempt.

If any person, agent, trustee, fiduciary, beneficiary, institution, association, or corporation receiving notice neglects to attend or to remain in attendance as long as may be necessary for the purposes for which the notice was issued, or refuses to produce books, memoranda, papers of whatever kind, documents of title, or other evidence of assets or liabilities, or to furnish any available information that may be required, any justice of the superior court for the county within which the inquiry is carried on or within which the person, agent, trustee, fiduciary, beneficiary, institution, association, or corporation is found or resides or transacts business, upon application of the attorney general, shall have jurisdiction to issue to the person, agent, trustee, fiduciary, beneficiary, institution, association, or corporation an order requiring the person, agent, trustee, fiduciary, beneficiary, institution, association, or corporation to appear before the attorney general to produce for the use of the attorney general evidence in accordance with the terms of the notice, and any failure to obey the order of the superior court may be punished by the court as a contempt of court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-11

.

18-9-12.
Privilege against self-incrimination unavailable — Immunity from prosecution.

No person shall be excused from testifying or from producing any book or paper in any investigation or inquiry by or upon any hearing before the attorney general, when ordered to do so by the attorney general, upon the ground that the testimony, or evidence of the book or document, required of that person may tend to incriminate that person or subject that person to a penalty or forfeiture; but no person shall be prosecuted, punished, or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any act, transaction, matter, or thing concerning which, after claiming this privilege, the person, by order of the attorney general, has testified under oath or produced documentary evidence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-12

.

18-9-13.
Annual fiduciary’s report.

Any fiduciary holding property subject to equitable duties to deal with the property for charitable, educational, or religious purposes shall annually, on or before July 1, unless otherwise directed by the attorney general, make to the attorney general a written report for the last preceding fiscal year of the trust showing the property held and administered, the receipts and expenditures in connection with the trust, the names and addresses of the beneficiaries of the trust, and any other information that the attorney general may require.

The trustee shall also pay an annual filing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) to the attorney general for use in performing the duties authorized in this chapter.

These fees shall be deposited in the general fund.

Failure after notice for two (2) successive years to file a report shall constitute a breach of trust and the attorney general shall take any action that may be appropriate to compel compliance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-13

; P.L. 1987, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 48; P.L. 1996, ch. 2, § 2.

18-9-14.
Reasonable care required regardless of language of trust.

Regardless of any language in the agreement, deed, or other instrument creating an inter vivos charitable trust, no trustee or trustees of a trust shall be exonerated from liability for failure to exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-14

.

18-9-15.
Institutions and contingent trusts exempt.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be applicable to charitable, religious, and educational institutions holding funds in trust exclusively for their own charter or corporate purposes nor to trusts in which the charitable interest is contingent upon the happening of an uncertain future event; provided, that upon the happening of the event vesting the charitable interest, the trust shall thereafter be subject to all the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2617, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

18-9-15

.

18-9-16.
Termination of certain charitable trusts.

A charitable trust with total assets of less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) may be terminated at any time at the discretion of the trustee or trustees with the consent of the attorney general and the beneficiary or beneficiaries by delivery of the assets to the beneficiary or beneficiaries.

Where the trustee or trustees have discretion in the selection of the beneficiary or beneficiaries, only the consent of the attorney general shall be required, and the discretion in the selection of the beneficiary or beneficiaries to receive the assets shall be exercised by the trustee or trustees.

The beneficiary or beneficiaries to whom the trust estate shall be delivered shall hold and apply the trust estate for the uses and purposes set forth in this instrument.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 281, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 393, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 450, § 1.

18-9-17.
Enforcement of the fiduciary responsibilities of the trustees of charitable trusts.

If the trustee(s) fails to register a charitable trust with the attorney general as required by this chapter, an additional fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) may be assessed at the time the trust is finally registered.

When a registered charitable trust with assets over twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) has failed to file an annual report with the charitable trust division of the department of attorney general for a period exceeding two (2) years, in addition to any other sanctions which may be imposed, a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be charged to the trust, in addition to the normal filing fee.

In the event that any charitable trust fails to take any actions that are required by this chapter, the attorney general may bring an action to restrain the charity from transacting any business in the state and may take any other action, including the seeking of any other judicial relief, that may be appropriate to compel compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter or who willingly and knowingly gives false or incorrect information to the attorney general in filing statements or reports as required by this chapter, whether the report or statement is verified or not, may be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 130, § 2.